Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.200

Lists of affected parties—Information used to establish lists—Purpose and use.

(1) Whenever application is made for the issuance of a marketing agreement or order or the director otherwise determines to hold a hearing for the purpose of such issuance, the director or a designee shall establish a list of affected parties along with volume of production data covering a minimum three-year period, or in such lesser time as the affected party has produced the commodity in question, from information provided by the petitioners, by obtaining information on affected parties from applicable producer, handler, or processor organizations or associations or other sources identified as maintaining the information.

(2) The director shall use the list of affected parties for the purpose of notice, referendum proceedings, and electing and selecting members of commodity boards in accordance with this chapter.

(3) An affected party may at any time file his or her name and mailing address with the director. A list of affected parties may be brought up-to-date by the director up to the day preceding a mailing of a notice or ballot under this chapter and that list is deemed the list of affected parties entitled to vote.

(4) The list of affected parties used for the issuance of a marketing order or agreement shall be kept in a file maintained by the director. The list shall be certified as a true representation of the mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected party does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

(5) The list of affected parties that is certified as the true representation of the mailing list of a referendum shall be used to determine assent as provided in this chapter.

(6) The director shall provide the commodity board the list of affected and interested parties once a marketing order or agreement is adopted and a commodity board is established as provided in this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 17; 1985 c 261 s 8; 1961 c 256 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.